District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-305.04

Immunity from civil liability.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 504
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-345.4.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 504 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).